Maine, session 132, LD1521.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1662, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. State budget document. For biennial budget documents for fiscal years 2027-28
and 2028-29, the budget document must be prepared and submitted using a budget process
that includes zero-based budgeting for each department and other agency in the Executive,
Legislative and Judicial Departments at least once every 10 years. For the purposes of this
subsection, "zero-based budgeting" means a method of budgeting in which programs and
activities are justified for a budgetary period using cost-benefit analysis without regard to
the amount that was budgeted for those programs and activities in a prior budgetary period;
Sec. 2. Budget provisions review. By January 1, 2026, the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services shall review the provisions of the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 5, chapter 149 and submit legislation to the Joint Standing Committee on
Appropriations and Financial Affairs by January 15, 2026 making necessary changes to
statute to facilitate the submission of a budget for fiscal years 2027-28 and 2028-29 that
includes zero-based budgeting based on the following conditions:
1. Establishing a zero-based budgeting system in which each agency is required to use
a zero-based budgeting format every 10 years;
2. Establishing a system for periodic agency review with the biennial budget;
3. Establishing targeted budgeting or a similar alternative budgeting system for
agencies for budget submissions during years when the agency is not submitting a
zero-based budget; and
4. Requiring the provision of alternative funding and budget recommendations for
agencies that, at a minimum, require recommendations from each agency outlining 5% and
10% funding reduction proposals during years when the agency is not submitting a
zero-based budget.
The joint standing committee may report out a bill to the Second Regular Session of
the 132nd Legislature based on the legislation submitted by the department.